Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Fire department” means any organization maintained for  the purpose of preventing
or combating fire.
(b) “PFAS firefighting foam” means a foam substance that contains an  intentionally
added perfluoroalkyl or polyfluoroalkyl substance  and that is used to control or extinguish
fire.
(2) Except as required by a regulation of the  Federal Aviation Administration or other
federal law, a fire department, including  any employee or volunteer of the fire department,
may not use PFAS firefighting foam in this state.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act becomes operative on July 1, 2026.
Passed by Senate March 4, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 5, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 91 (SB 91-A) Page 1